Utah statutes.
13-32a-109.   Holding period for articles.
(1) (a)  The pawnbroker may sell any article pawned to the pawnbroker:
(i)  after the expiration of the contract period between the pawnbroker and
the pledgor; and
(ii)  if the pawnbroker has complied with the requirements of Section
13-32a-106 regarding reporting to the central database and Section 13-32a-103.
(b)  If an article, including scrap jewelry, is purchased by a pawn or
secondhand business or a coin dealer, the pawn or secondhand business or coin
dealer may sell the article after the pawn or secondhand business or coin
dealer has held the article for 15 days and complied with the requirements of
Section 13-32a-106 regarding reporting to the central database and Section
13-32a-103, except that pawn, secondhand, and coin dealer businesses are not
required to hold precious metals or coins under this Subsection (1)(b).
(c)  This Subsection (1) does not preclude a law enforcement agency from
requiring a pawn or secondhand business to hold an article if necessary in the
course of an investigation.
(i)  If the article was pawned, the law enforcement agency may require the
article be held beyond the terms of the contract between the pledgor and the
pawn broker.
(ii)  If the article was sold to the pawn or secondhand business, the law
enforcement agency may require the article be held if the pawn or secondhand
business has not sold the article.
(d)  If the law enforcement agency requesting a hold on property under this
Subsection (1) is not the local law enforcement agency, the requesting law
enforcement agency shall notify the local law enforcement agency of the
request and also the pawn or secondhand business.
(2)  If a law enforcement agency requires the pawn or secondhand business to
hold an article as part of an investigation, the agency shall provide to the
pawn or secondhand business a hold ticket issued by the agency, which:
(a)  states the active case number;
(b)  confirms the date of the hold request and the article to be held; and
(c)  facilitates the ability of the pawn or secondhand business to track the
article when the prosecution takes over the case.
(3)  If an article is not seized by a law enforcement agency that has placed a
hold on the property, the property may remain in the custody of the pawn or
secondhand business until further disposition by the law enforcement agency,
and as consistent with this chapter.
(4)  The initial hold by a law enforcement agency is for a period of 90 days.
If the article is not seized by the law enforcement agency, the article shall
remain in the custody of the pawn or secondhand business and is subject to the
hold unless exigent circumstances require the purchased or pawned article to
be seized by the law enforcement agency.
(5) (a)  A law enforcement agency may extend any hold for up to an additional
90 days when exigent circumstances require the extension.
(b)  When there is an extension of a hold under Subsection (5)(a), the
requesting law enforcement agency shall notify the pawn or secondhand business
that is subject to the hold prior to the expiration of the initial 90 days.
(c)  A law enforcement agency may not hold an item for more than the 180 days
allowed under Subsections (5)(a) and (b) without obtaining a court order
authorizing the hold.
(6)  A hold on an article under Subsection (2) takes precedence over any
request to claim or purchase the article subject to the hold.
(7)  When the purpose for the hold on or seizure of an article is terminated,
the law enforcement agency requiring the hold or seizure shall within 15 days
after the termination:
(a)  notify the pawn or secondhand business in writing that the hold or
seizure has been terminated;
(b)  return the article subject to the seizure to the pawn or secondhand
business; or
(c)  if the article is not returned to the pawn or secondhand business, advise
the pawn or secondhand business either in writing or electronically of the
specific alternative disposition of the article.
